Hawaii statutes.
[§456-19] Notary signing for
disabled person. A notary may sign the name of a person physically unable
to sign or to make a mark on a document presented for notarization; provided
that the notary is satisfied that the person has voluntarily given consent for
the notary to sign on the person's behalf, if the notary writes, in the
presence of the person: "Signature affixed by notary pursuant to section
456-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes." beneath the signature, and if a doctor's
written certificate is provided to the notary certifying that the person is
unable to physically sign or make a mark because of the disability, and that
the person is capable of communicating the person's intentions. [L 1995, c 141,
§1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next